Indiana, session 2026, HB1392.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-26-17 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 17. Involuntary Treatment for Substance Use Disorder
Sec. 1. (a) Involuntary treatment for substance use disorder may
be considered by the court under this chapter upon the filing of a
petition with a court having jurisdiction in the county where the
individual:
(1) resides; or
(2) may be located.
(b) A petition may be filed under subsection (a) by an
individual's:
(1) spouse;
(2) legal guardian; or
(3) friend or relative.
2026 IN 1392—LS 6803/DI 149


(c) A petition filed under subsection (a) must include the
following:
(1) The individual's name and date of birth.
(2) All factual allegations to support that the individual:
(A) has a substance use disorder;
(B) is a danger to self or others or is unable to
independently maintain the individual's activities of daily
living because of a substance use disorder;
(C) is unable to make the decision to seek treatment or has
refused to seek treatment for substance use disorder; and
(D) is in need of treatment for substance use disorder.
(3) If an individual is represented by an attorney, the petition
must identify the individual's attorney.
(d) A petition filed under subsection (a) must be served on:
(1) the individual;
(2) any court appointed legal guardian of the individual; and
(3) the individual's attorney, if applicable.
Sec. 2. (a) Upon receipt of a petition filed under section 1 of this
chapter, unless impracticable, the court:
(1) shall, if the petition contains all elements required by
section 1(c) of this chapter, conduct a hearing not later than
fifteen (15) days after the petition is filed; or
(2) may dismiss, without prejudice, a petition that does not
comply with section 1(c) of this chapter.
(b) If the individual is not represented by an attorney, the court
shall appoint a public defender to represent the individual.
(c) Notice of a hearing conducted under this section shall be
served on:
(1) the individual;
(2) any court appointed legal guardian of the individual;
(3) the petitioner; and
(4) the individual's attorney or the appointed public defender.
(d) A request for a continuance of the hearing described in
subsection (a) for a period of not more than thirty (30) days may
be granted for good cause shown.
Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), if, upon the
completion of the hearing and consideration of the record, the
court finds that:
(1) the individual has a substance use disorder;
(2) because of the individual's substance use disorder, the
individual is experiencing impaired judgment and is:
(A) unable to independently maintain the individual's
2026 IN 1392—LS 6803/DI 149


activities of daily living; or
(B) a danger to self or others; and
(3) the individual refuses to voluntarily participate in
substance use disorder treatment;
the court shall order that the individual be evaluated by two (2)
medical providers concerning substance use disorder. At least one
(1) of the medical providers ordered to complete an evaluation
must be a licensed physician.
(b) If the court makes findings under subsection (a), the court
shall order:
(1) the individual to undergo an evaluation with the
appropriate medical providers within fifteen (15) days;
(2) that the evaluations from the medical providers must be
submitted to the court not later than fifteen (15) days after the
evaluation is completed. The evaluations submitted to the
court under this subdivision must include treatment
recommendations, if applicable; and
(3) the petitioner to pay all costs and fees of the two (2)
evaluations.
(c) If, upon the completion of the hearing and consideration of
the record, the evidence supports that the individual may meet the
criteria for emergency detention under IC 12-26-5, the court shall
order the local law enforcement agency to consider whether
reasonable grounds exist to believe that the individual has a mental
illness, is either dangerous or gravely disabled, and is in immediate
need of hospitalization and treatment under IC 12-26-5-0.5. If
applicable, the individual may be subject to the emergency
detention procedures under IC 12-26-5. If an emergency detention
is initiated, the petition for involuntary treatment filed under this
chapter shall be dismissed without prejudice.
(d) Upon receipt of the evaluations under subsection (b)(2), the
court shall do the following:
(1) Dismiss the petition if the evaluations do not recommend
that the individual requires immediate treatment for
substance use disorder.
(2) Set a hearing date to hear further evidence and make a
determination as to the appropriate treatment for the
individual if at least one (1) of the evaluations from the
medical providers recommend immediate treatment for
substance use disorder. The individual, petitioner, and both
medical providers shall be ordered to appear at the hearing.
Additional witnesses with relevant information may also
2026 IN 1392—LS 6803/DI 149


appear to provide testimony.
A hearing notice issued under this section shall be served in
accordance with section 2(c) of this chapter and shall also be
served on each medical provider that has submitted an evaluation
to the court.
(e) The individual must appear at a hearing under this section.
If the individual does not appear and the court finds that:
(1) the individual was properly served; and
(2) the evidence supports that the individual knowingly and
voluntarily waived the right to be present at the hearing;
it is within the court's discretion to continue the hearing to a later
date or proceed with the hearing without the individual. A hearing
may be continued under this subsection for not more than thirty
(30) days.
(f) If the court finds, after considering the evidence presented at
a hearing ordered under subsection (d)(2), that:
(1) medical evidence supports that the individual requires
immediate treatment for a substance use disorder;
(2) the individual is a danger to themself or others; and
(3) the individual has refused substance use disorder
treatment;
the court shall order the individual to receive involuntary
substance use disorder treatment for a period not less than sixty
(60) days and not more than three hundred sixty (360) days. The
court's treatment requirements for the individual shall be based
upon the testimony and recommendations of testifying medical
providers that have evaluated or treated the individual.
Sec. 4. A petition filed under this chapter shall be dismissed:
(1) when the three hundred sixty (360) day treatment
limitation described in section 3(f) of this chapter has expired;
(2) when the substance use disorder treatment provider
releases the individual from treatment; or
(3) when the individual voluntarily enters appropriate
substance use disorder treatment and submits documentation
confirming the voluntary treatment to the court;
whichever is earliest.
Sec. 5. The petitioner is financially responsible for all medical
expenses, including out of pocket costs and uninsured expenses,
that result from an individual receiving court ordered involuntary
substance use disorder treatment under this chapter.
Sec. 6. An individual may be subject to contempt proceedings
for a failure or refusal to comply with a court order issued under
2026 IN 1392—LS 6803/DI 149


this chapter.
Sec. 7. Nothing in this chapter prevents an individual from being
subject to an emergency detention or commitment order under this
article, if the relevant criteria are met.
2026 IN 1392—LS 6803/DI 149